Massachusetts, session 194th, H2867.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 31 of the General Laws as amended by Chapter 238 of the Acts of 2024 is 
hereby further amended by inserting at the end of Section 75 the following:-   
Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit civil service employees to furnish 
information to, or cooperate with, law enforcement authorities in contravention of Section 11I½ 
of Chapter 12.